Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB391.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 171 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kids Love to Read Program is hereby established. The purpose of the
program shall be to promote the development of a comprehensive statewide
initiative for encouraging children in kindergarten through grade five (5) to
develop and continue a love of reading and learning. For purposes of this section,
"state program" means the Kids Love to Read Program and "statewide program
provider" means the nonprofit organization chosen by the Department for
Libraries and Archives to deliver the state program.
(2) State program funds shall be used to provide, through the Kids Love to Read
Program, one (1) book each week of the school year to each registered child in
kindergarten through grade five (5). Books shall be sent to each child's home at
no cost to families. The state program shall contribute a fifty percent (50%)
match of funds, if available, necessary for the program.
(3) The Department for Libraries and Archives shall administer the state program in
coordination with the statewide program provider. A nonprofit organization shall
be eligible to apply to be the statewide program provider. The statewide program
provider shall be selected by the department based on evidence of the applicant's
ability to:
(a) Deliver an evidence-based self-selected reading program consisting of
independent reading level books that are individually mailed to the
residences of kindergarten through grade five (5) children on a weekly
basis;
(b) Incorporate at least weekly phone calls, texts, or application notifications in
multiple languages to a parent or guardian to drive parental and family
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/13/2026 6:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1650
engagement throughout the duration of the state program;
(c) Provide at least six (6) child-selected new books that children get to keep;
(d) Build on pedagogical and literacy principles to scaffold fluency to improve
reading comprehension with children;
(e) Provide a customizable portal to generate individualized data reports for
analysis of a child's progress;
(f) Collect, disaggregate, and distribute detailed data on all metrics of the state
program, such as parental engagement, books read, and allowable
demographic data;
(g) Provide summary data to the department for all children served by the state
program;
(h) Secure the required fifty percent (50%) matching funds; and
(i) Guarantee that the total cost of the state program, including matching
funds, shall not exceed one hundred twenty dollars ($120) per child per
year.
(4) The Department of Libraries and Archives shall promulgate regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as necessary to administer the state program.
(5) (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency
account to be known as the Kids Love to Read Program fund. The fund
shall consist of moneys received from state appropriations, gifts, grants, and
federal funds.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the Department for Libraries and
Archives.
(c) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for the purposes set forth in
this section and for no other purpose.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a
fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/13/2026 6:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1650
year.
Section 2. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget
Reserve Trust Fund account established in KRS 48.705 in the amount of $500,000 in
fiscal year 2027-2028 to the Kids Love to Read Program fund.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/13/2026 6:34 PM Jacketed